Utah statutes.
59-10-1310.   Contribution to Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 59-10-1304, a resident or nonresident individual that files an individual income tax return under this chapter may designate on the resident or nonresident individual's individual income tax return a contribution as provided in this section to be:

(a)  deposited into the Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account created by Section 4-40-102; and

(b)  distributed by the Department of Health as provided in Section 4-40-102.

(2)  The commission shall:

(a)  determine annually the total amount of contributions designated in accordance with this section; and

(b)  credit the amount described in Subsection (2)(a) to the Cat and Dog Community Spay and Neuter Program Restricted Account created by Section 4-40-102.

